Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERALLY

§486J-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Aviation fuel" means and includes
all liquid substances of whatever chemical composition usable for the
propulsion of airplanes.

"Biofuels" means liquid or gaseous
fuels produced from organic sources such as biomass crops, agricultural
residues, and oil crops, such as palm oil, canola oil, soybean oil, waste
cooking oil, grease, and food wastes, animal residues and wastes, and sewage
and landfill wastes.

"Classes of retail trade" means the
separate subdivisions, or "classes", of outlets or methods of retail
sales of liquid fuels, typically but not always limited to gasoline and diesel
for motor vehicles, and includes any:

(1) Company-operated station that is a retail service
station owned and operated by a refiner or wholesale distributor and where
retail prices are set by that refiner or wholesale distributor;

(2) Lessee dealer-operated station that is a retail
service station owned by a refiner or wholesale distributor and operated by a
qualified gasoline dealer other than a refiner or wholesale distributor under a
franchise; or

(3) Owner-operated station that is a retail service
station not owned by a refiner or wholesale distributor and operated by a
qualified gasoline dealer.

"Commission" means the public
utilities commission.

"Department" means the department of
business, economic development, and tourism.

"Director" means the director of
business, economic development, and tourism.

"Distributor" means:

(1) Every person who refines, manufactures, produces,
or compounds fuel in the State and sells it at wholesale or at retail;

(2) Every person who imports or causes to be imported
into the State, or exports or causes to be exported from the State, any fuel;

(3) Every person who acquires fuel through exchanges
with another distributor; or

(4) Every person who purchases fuel for resale at
wholesale or retail from any person described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3);
provided that "distributor" shall not include a marina, lessee dealer-operated
station, owner-operated station, or other retailer that retails fuel only to
end users or the public.

"Energy" means work or heat that is,
or may be, produced from any fuel or source whatsoever.

"Fuel" means fuels, whether liquid,
solid, or gaseous, commercially usable for energy needs, power generation, and
fuels manufacture, that may be manufactured, grown, produced, or imported into
the State or that may be exported therefrom, including petroleum and petroleum
products and gases, coal, coal tar, vegetable ferments, and all fuel alcohols.

"Inventory" means the volume, in
barrels, of reserve that is normally maintained by the reporting entity on a
monthly basis.

"Liquid fuel" means fuels in liquid
form, commercially usable for energy needs, power generation, and fuels that
may be manufactured, produced, or imported into the State or that may be
exported therefrom, including petroleum and petroleum products and all fuel
alcohols.

"Month" or "calendar month"
means each full month of the calendar year.

"Person" means any person, firm,
association, organization, partnership, business trust, corporation, or
company. "Person" also includes any city, county, public district or
agency, the State, or any department or agency thereof, and the United States
to the extent authorized by federal law.

"Refiner" means any person who owns,
operates, or controls the operations of one or more refineries in Hawaii.

"Refinery" means any industrial
plant, regardless of capacity, processing crude oil feedstock and manufacturing
oil products.

"Storage capacity" means the maximum
volume, in barrels, of used and useful facility capacity for storage. [L 1997,
c 257, pt of §2; am L 2002, c 77, §3(1); am L 2006, c 78, §3; am L 2007, c 182,
§3; am L 2010, c 152, §3]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next